Montana, session 2025, HB6.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Appropriations. (1) There is appropriated from the natural resources
projects state special revenue account established in 15-38-302 to the department of natural resources and
conservation for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, up to:
(a) $500,000 for emergency projects grants to be awarded by the department over the biennium;
(b) $2 million $1 MILLION for planning grants to be awarded by the department over the biennium;
(c) $500,000 for irrigation development grants to be awarded by the department over the
biennium;
(d) $150,000 for private grants to be awarded by the department over the biennium; and
(e) $1 million $500,000 for nonpoint source pollution reduction grants to be awarded by the
department over the biennium.
(2) There is appropriated $5.25 million $2.5 MILLION $4,750,000 from the natural resources projects
state special revenue account established in 15-38-302 to the department of natural resources and
conservation for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025. The funds in this subsection (2) must be awarded by the
department to the named entities for the described purposes and in the grant amounts listed in subsection (4),
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
subject to the conditions set forth in [sections 2 and 3] and the contingencies described in the renewable
resource grant and loan program's January 2025 report to the 69th legislature titled: "Governor's Executive
Budget Fiscal Years 2026–2027 Volume 6".
(3) Funds must be awarded up to the amounts approved in subsection (4) in the order of priority
listed until the available funds are expended. Funds not accepted or used by higher-ranked projects must be
provided for projects farther down the priority list that would not otherwise receive funding. If at any time a grant
recipient determines that a project will not begin before June 30, 2027, the grant recipient shall notify the
department of natural resources and conservation. After all eligible projects are funded, any remaining funds
may be used for any renewable resource project authorized under this section.
(4) The prioritized infrastructure grant projects are as follows:
RENEWABLE RESOURCE INFRASTRUCTURE GRANT PROJECTS
Rank Applicant/Project Amount
1 Arlee Lake County Water and Sewer District
Arlee Lake County Water and Sewer District Wastewater System Upgrades $125,000
2 Whitehall, Town of
Whitehall Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
3 Deer Lodge, City of
Deer Lodge Wastewater Collection System Improvements $125,000
4 Missoula, City of
Missoula Public Library Living Roof Stormwater Control $125,000
5 4 Harrison Water and Sewer District
Harrison Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
6 5 Madison County
Madison County Pennington Bridge Big Hole River Restoration $125,000
7 6 South Wind County Water and Sewer District
South Wind Drinking Water and Wastewater Improvements, Phase 4 $125,000
8 7 Willow Creek Sewer District
Willow Creek Sewer District Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
9 8 Roundup, City of
Roundup Wastewater Lagoon System Upgrades $125,000
10 9 Judith Basin County
Judith Basin County Geyser Wastewater Treatment System Improvements $125,000
11 10 Martinsdale Water and Sewer District
Martinsdale Water and Sewer District Water System Improvements $125,000
12 11 Alder Water and Sewer District
Alder Water and Sewer District Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
13 12 Fairfield, Town of
Fairfield Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
14 13 Dutton, Town of
Dutton Drinking Water System Improvements, Phase 2 $125,000
15 14 Circle, Town of
Circle Water System Improvements, Phase 5 $125,000
16 15 Malta, City of
Malta Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
17 16 Red Lodge, City of
Red Lodge Wastewater System Improvements, Phases 2 and 3 $125,000
18 17 Hysham, Town of
Hysham Drinking Water System Improvements, Phase 2 $125,000
19 18 Darby, Town of
Darby Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
20 19 Sheridan, Town of
Sheridan Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
21 20 Richey, Town of
Richey Drinking Water System Improvements, Phase 3 $125,000
22 21 Ennis, Town of
Ennis Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
23 22 Basin Water and/or Sewer District
Basin Water and/or Sewer District Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
24 23 Manhattan, Town of
Manhattan Water System Improvements $125,000
25 24 Cooke City Water District
Cooke City Drinking Water Infrastructure Improvements $125,000
26 25 Treasure State Acres Water and Sewer District
Treasure State Acres Wastewater Treatment System Improvements $125,000
27 26 St. Ignatius, Town of
St. Ignatius Wastewater Collection Main Replacement $125,000
28 27 Twin Bridges, Town of
Twin Bridges Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
29 28 Libby, City of
Libby Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
30 29 Sun Prairie Village County Water and Sewer District
Sun Prairie Village Drinking Water System Upgrades $125,000
31 30 Plentywood, City of
Plentywood Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
32 31 White Sulphur Springs, City of
White Sulphur Springs Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
33 32 Big Timber, City of
Big Timber Drinking Water Storage Improvements $125,000
34 33 Wolf Point, City of
Wolf Point Wastewater System Improvements, Phase 3 $125,000
35 34 Bigfork County Water and Sewer District
Bigfork Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
36 35 Shelby, City of
Shelby Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
37 36 Ronan, City Of
Ronan Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
38 27 Bearcreek, Town of
Bearcreek Drinking Water System Improvements, Phase 1 $125,000
39 38 Conrad, City of
Conrad Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
40 39 Pinesdale, Town of
Pinesdale Drinking Water System Improvements $125,000
41 40 Hinsdale County Water and Sewer District
Hinsdale County Water and Sewer District Water System Upgrades $125,000
42 41 Joliet, Town of
Joliet Wastewater System Improvements $125,000
(5) There is appropriated $3,474,500 $2,520,000 $2,744,500 from the natural resources projects
state special revenue account established in 15-38-302 to the department of natural resources and
conservation for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025. The funds in this subsection (5) must be awarded by the
department to the named entities for the described purposes and in the grant amounts listed in subsection (7),
subject to the conditions set forth in [sections 2 and 3] and the contingencies described in the renewable
resource grant and loan program's January 2025 report to the 68th legislature titled: "Governor's Executive
Budget Fiscal Years 2026–2027 Volume 6".
(6) Funds must be awarded up to the amounts approved in subsection (7) in the order of priority
listed until the available funds are expended. Funds not accepted or used by higher-ranked projects must be
provided for projects farther down the priority list that would not otherwise receive funding. If at any time a grant
recipient determines that a project will not begin before June 30, 2027, the grant recipient shall notify the
department of natural resources and conservation. After all eligible projects are funded, any remaining funds
may be used for any renewable resource project authorized under this section.
(7) The prioritized irrigation grant projects are as follows:
RENEWABLE RESOURCE IRRIGATION GRANT PROJECTS
Rank Applicant/Project Amount
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
1 Granite County Conservation District
Granite County Flint Creek Dam Improvements $125,000
2 1 Pondera County Conservation District
Pondera County Conservation District S-Canal Pipeline Conversion $125,000
3 2 Yellowstone County
Yellowstone County Billings Bench Water Association Rattlesnake Reservoir Water Management
Improvements $125,000
4 3 Yellowstone Irrigation District
Yellowstone Irrigation District Canal Rehabilitation $125,000
5 4 Lower Yellowstone Irrigation District #1
Lower Yellowstone Irrigation District Thomas Point Pump Station Rehabilitation, Phase 2
$125,000
6 5 Savage Irrigation District
Savage Irrigation District Pumping Plant Rehabilitation, Phase 2 $125,000
7 6 Clinton Irrigation District
Clinton Irrigation District Schoolhouse Lateral Pipeline Conversion, Phase 4 $125,000
8 7 Helena Valley Irrigation District
Helena Valley Irrigation District Lateral 26.6 and Lateral 20.7-3.3 Seepage Mitigation
$125,000
9 8 Helena Valley Irrigation District
Helena Valley Irrigation District Pumping Plant Automation $125,000
10 9 Greenfields Irrigation District
Greenfields Irrigation District Check Replacement, Phase 2 $125,000
11 10 Tongue and Yellowstone River Irrigation District
Tongue and Yellowstone River Irrigation District Cowles Creek Flume Replacement
$125,000
12 11 Tongue and Yellowstone River Irrigation District
Tongue and Yellowstone River Irrigation District Jones Creek Flume and Canal Conversion
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
$125,000
13 12 Bitterroot Conservation District
Bitterroot Conservation District Union Diversion Resource Improvements $125,000
14 13 Fort Belknap Irrigation District
Fort Belknap Irrigation District Main Canal Lining Project $125,000
15 14 Petroleum County Conservation District
Petroleum County Conservation District McDonald Creek Diversion Structures Replacement
$125,000
16 15 Malta Irrigation District
Malta Irrigation District Black Coulee Siphon Replacement $125,000
17 16 Yellowstone Irrigation District
Yellowstone Irrigation District Lateral 17.6 Rehabilitation, Phase 1 $125,000
18 17 Sweet Grass Conservation District
Sweet Grass Conservation District Crest Ditch Headgate Rehabilitation $125,000
19 18 Petrolia Irrigation District
Petrolia Irrigation District Main Canal Pipeline Conversion $125,000
20 19 Glen Lake Irrigation District
Glen Lake Irrigation District Doxie Slough Seepage Mitigation Project $125,000
21 Granite Conservation District
Granite Conservation District Allendale Ditch Rehabilitation $125,000
22 20 Hammond Irrigation District
Hammond Irrigation District Big Porcupine Siphon Rehabilitation $125,000
21 SUNSET IRRIGATION DISTRICT
HEADGATE REPAIR $20,000
23 22 Greenfields Irrigation District
Greenfields Irrigation District J-Wasteway Modernization $125,000
24 23 Bitter Root Irrigation District
Bitter Root Irrigation District Diversion Control Modernization $99,500
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
25 24 Zurich Irrigation District
Zurich Irrigation District Brown Creek Siphon Rehabilitation $125,000
26 25 Kinsey Irrigation District
Kinsey Irrigation District Harris Creek Spill Structure Rehabilitation $125,000
27 26 Kinsey Irrigation District
Kinsey Irrigation District Hammerbacker Lateral to Pipeline Conversion $125,000
28 27 Fort Shaw Irrigation District
Fort Shaw Irrigation District Simms Creek Siphon Replacement $125,000

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Coordination of fund sources for grants to political subdivisions
and local governments. A grant recipient listed under [section 1(4) and (7)] may not receive funds from both
the reclamation and development grants program and the renewable resource grant and loan program for the
same project during the same biennium.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Condition of grants. The disbursement of funds under [section 1] is
subject to the following conditions that must be met by the grant recipient:
(1) The grant recipient must have a scope of work, schedule, and budget for the project that is
approved by the department of natural resources and conservation. Any changes in scope of work or budget
after legislative approval may not alter project goals and objectives. Changes in activities that would reduce the
public or natural resource benefits as presented in department of natural resources and conservation reports
and applicant testimony to the 69th legislature may result in a proportional reduction in the grant amount.
(2) The grant recipient must document that other matching funds required for completion of the
project are firmly committed.
(3) The grant recipient must have a project management plan that is approved by the department
of natural resources and conservation.
(4) The grant recipient shall comply with the auditing and reporting requirements provided for in 2-
7-503 and establish a financial accounting system that the department can reasonably ensure conforms to
generally accepted accounting principles. Tribal governments shall comply with the auditing and reporting
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
requirements provided for in 2 CFR 200.
(5) The grant recipient shall satisfactorily complete the conditions described in the
recommendation section of the project narrative of the program report to the legislature for the biennium ending
June 30, 2027, or, in the case of planning grants issued under [section 1(1)], complete the conditions specified
at the time of written notification of the approved grant authority.
(6) The grant recipient shall execute a grant agreement with the department of natural resources
and conservation.
(7) Any other specific requirements considered necessary by the department must be met to
accomplish the purpose of the grant as evidenced from the application to the department or from the proposal
as presented to the legislature.

NEW SECTION. SECTION 4. LOCAL GOVERNMENT REQUIREMENTS BEFORE FUNDS ARE RELEASED. (1) TO
BE ELIGIBLE TO RECEIVE FUNDING UNDER [THIS ACT], A LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL ESTABLISH AND CONTINUALLY FUND
A CAPITAL RESERVE ACCOUNT MEETING THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (3) FOR NECESSARY INFRASTRUCTURE
IMPROVEMENTS, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO IMPROVEMENTS TO WATER SUPPLY SYSTEMS, WASTEWATER SYSTEMS,
IRRIGATION SYSTEMS, AND WATER STORAGE DAMS WITH WATER STORAGE CAPACITY IN EXCESS OF 3,000 ACRE FEET
AND THAT ARE NOT PART OF A PUBLIC WATER SYSTEM.
(2) THE CAPITAL RESERVE ACCOUNT MUST BE ESTABLISHED PRIOR TO THE RECEIPT OF GRANT FUNDS
UNDER [THIS ACT].
(3) THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT SHALL DEPOSIT INTO THE CAPITAL RESERVE ACCOUNT:
(A) AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO 10% OF THE REVENUES RECEIVED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT FROM WATER
SUPPLY FEES, WASTEWATER SYSTEM USAGE FEES, OR WATER DELIVERY FEES ASSESSED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT;
OR
(B) FOR THE OWNERS OF WATER STORAGE DAMS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1), AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO $5
PER ACRE FOOT OF WATER STORAGE CAPACITY. REVENUES OR ROYALTIES FROM THE PRODUCTION AND SALE OF
ELECTRICITY, GENERAL FUND REVENUES USED FOR THE MAINTENANCE OF WATER STORAGE DAMS AND OTHER
STRUCTURES OWNED BY THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT, AND FEES LEVIED ON ALL MEMBERS OF A CONSERVATION DISTRICT
AS THE CONSERVATION DISTRICT EXISTED ON JANUARY 1, 2025, WHERE THE DAM IS LOCATED MAY BE USED TO MEET
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
THE REQUIREMENT OF THIS SUBSECTION (3)(B).
(C) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY NOT CREATE ANY FORM OF SPECIAL OR IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT TO FUND
THE CAPITAL RESERVE ACCOUNT PROVIDED FOR IN THIS SECTION.
(4) A LOCAL GOVERNMENT MAY ONLY EXPEND FUNDS FROM THE CAPITAL RESERVE ACCOUNT TO FUND
PROJECTS WITH A TOTAL ESTIMATED COST OF AT LEAST $50,000.
(5) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "LOCAL GOVERNMENT" MEANS A COUNTY, CITY, TOWN, CONSOLIDATED CITY-
COUNTY, IRRIGATION DISTRICT, DRAINAGE DISTRICT, CONSERVATION DISTRICT, OR WATER USERS' ASSOCIATION OR
DITCH COMPANY ORGANIZED AND INCORPORATED PURSUANT TO TITLE 35, CHAPTER 14, OR TITLE 85, CHAPTER 6, PART
1.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Appropriations established. There is appropriated to any entity of state
government that receives a grant under [section 1] the amount of the grant upon award of the grant by the
department of natural resources and conservation. Grants to entities from prior biennia are reauthorized for the
completion of contract work.

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Approval of grants -- completion of biennial appropriation. The
legislature, pursuant to 85-1-605, approves the renewable resource grant and loan program grants listed in
[section 1]. The authorization of these grants constitutes a biennial appropriation from the natural resources
projects state special revenue account established in 15-38-302.

SECTION 6. SECTION 85-1-612, MCA, IS AMENDED TO READ:
"85-1-612. Rulemaking authority. The department shall adopt rules:
(1) prescribing a reasonable application fee and the form and content of applications for grants
and loans;
(2) governing the application of the criteria for awarding loans and grants to private persons;
(3) providing for the servicing of loans including arrangements for obtaining security interests and
the establishment of reasonable fees or charges to be made;
(4) describing the terms and conditions for making grants and loans, the security instruments, and
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
the agreements necessary;
(5) describing the ranking criteria used to evaluate and prioritize grants to governmental entities,
which must include a ratio calculated by dividing the amount of the locally provided match, which includes cash
or capital improvement funds, by the annual operating budget for the system. Projects with a higher ratio of
match may be given priority over other projects with a lower ratio, and consideration must be given to the size
and cost of the proposed project, the number of users the project serves, and the ability of the applicant to fund
the fund dedicated to capital improvements.
(6) specifying any other procedures necessary to accomplish the objectives of the renewable
resource grant and loan program."

NEW SECTION. Section 7. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.

COORDINATION SECTION. Section 9. Coordination instruction. (1) If both [this act] and an act
that provides additional funding for renewable resource grant and loan program grants from a source other than
the natural resources projects state special revenue account established in 15-38-302 are passed and
approved, the projects listed in [section 1(4) and (7) of this act] that do not receive funding from the
appropriations in [section 1(2) and (5) of this act] may receive funding from the appropriation in the other act
designated for renewable resource grant and loan program grants in the order of completion of the conditions of
[section 3 of this act] and to the extent that there is appropriation authority available.
(2) Appropriations made in [section 1(1)(a) through(1)(e)] may be adjusted within [section 1(1)(a)
through (1)(e)] within the biennium based on demand or emergencies.

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0006.4
- END -
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 6